Vermont, session 2025-2026, S24.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 1264 is amended to read:
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 2 of 14
§ 1264. STORMWATER MANAGEMENT
* * *
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
* * *
(2) “Development” means the construction of impervious surface on a
tract or tracts of land where no impervious surface previously existed.
(3) “Expansion” and “the expanded portion of an existing discharge”
mean an increase or addition of impervious surface, such that the total resulting
impervious area is greater than the minimum regulatory threshold.
* * *
(6) “Impervious surface” means those manmade surfaces, including
paved and unpaved roads, parking areas, roofs, driveways, and walkways, from
which precipitation runs off rather than infiltrates.
* * *
(10) “Regulated stormwater runoff” means precipitation, snowmelt, and
the material dissolved or suspended in precipitation and snowmelt that runs off
impervious surfaces and discharges into surface waters or into groundwater via
infiltration.
(11) “Stormwater impact fee” means the monetary charge assessed to a
permit applicant for the discharge of regulated stormwater runoff in order to
mitigate impacts that the discharger is unable to control through on-site
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 3 of 14
treatment or completion of an offset on a site owned or controlled by the
permit applicant.
(12) “Stormwater-impaired water” means a State water that the
Secretary determines is significantly impaired by discharges of regulated
stormwater runoff.
(13) “Stormwater Management Manual” means the Agency of Natural
Resources’ Stormwater Management Manual, as adopted and amended by rule.
(14) “Stormwater runoff” means precipitation and snowmelt that does
not infiltrate into the soil, including material dissolved or suspended in it, but
does not include discharges from undisturbed natural terrain or wastes from
combined sewer overflows.
(15) “Stormwater system” includes the storm sewers; outfall sewers;
surface drains; manmade wetlands; channels; ditches; wet and dry bottom
basins; rain gardens; and other control equipment necessary and appurtenant to
the collection, transportation, conveyance, pumping, treatment, disposal, and
discharge of regulated stormwater runoff.
(16) “Total maximum daily load” (TMDL) means the calculations and
plan for meeting water quality standards approved by the U.S. Environmental
Protection Agency (EPA) and prepared pursuant to 33 U.S.C. § 1313(d) and
federal regulations adopted under that law.
* * *
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 4 of 14
(c) Prohibitions.
(1) A person shall not commence the construction or redevelopment of
one-half of an acre or more of impervious surface without first obtaining a
permit from the Secretary.
* * *
(7) In accordance with the schedule established under subdivision (g)(3)
of this section, a person shall not discharge stormwater from impervious
surface located within the Lake Champlain watershed or the Lake
Memphremagog watershed of three or more acres in size without first
obtaining an individual permit or coverage under a general permit issued under
this section if the discharge was never previously permitted or was permitted
under an individual permit or general permit that did not incorporate the
requirements of the 2002 Stormwater Management Manual or any
subsequently adopted Stormwater Management Manual.
(d) Exemptions.
* * *
(2) No permit is required under subdivision (c)(1), (5), or (7) of this
section and for which a municipality has assumed full legal responsibility as
part of a permit issued to the municipality by the Secretary. As used in this
subdivision, “full legal responsibility” means legal control of the stormwater
system, including a legal right to access the stormwater system, a legal duty to
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 5 of 14
properly maintain the stormwater system, and a legal duty to repair and replace
the stormwater system when it no longer adequately protects waters of the
State. When a municipality assumes full legal responsibility for a stormwater
system, the municipality may assess municipal impact fees on users of the
stormwater system provided that the impact fee assessed is a fair
apportionment to the user of the cost of the improvement in accordance with
the benefits the user received.
* * *
(f) Rulemaking. On or before December 31, 2017, the Secretary shall
adopt rules to manage stormwater runoff. At a minimum, the rules shall:
* * *
(7) Allow municipal governments to assume the full legal responsibility
for a stormwater system permitted under these rules as a part of a permit issued
by the Secretary, including authority of municipalities to assess municipal
impact fees on users of a stormwater system for which the municipal
government has assumed full responsibility.
(8) Include standards with respect to the use of offsets and stormwater
impact fees.
* * *
(g) General permits.
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 6 of 14
(1) The Secretary may issue general permits for classes of stormwater
runoff that shall be adopted and administered in accordance with the provisions
of subsection 1263(b) of this title.
* * *
(3) Within 120 days after the adoption by the Secretary of the rules
required under subsection (f) of this section, the Secretary shall issue a general
permit under this section for discharges of stormwater from impervious surface
of three or more acres in size, when the stormwater discharge previously was
not permitted or was permitted under an individual permit or general permit
that did not incorporate the requirements of the 2002 Stormwater Management
Manual or any subsequently adopted Stormwater Management Manual. Under
the general permit, the Secretary shall:
(A) Establish a schedule for implementation of the general permit by
geographic area of the State. The schedule shall establish the date by which an
owner of impervious surface shall apply for coverage under this subdivision
(3). The schedule established by the Secretary shall require an owner of
impervious surface subject to permitting under this subdivision to obtain
coverage by the following dates:
(i) for impervious surface located within the Lake Champlain
watershed, the Lake Memphremagog watershed, or the watershed of a
stormwater-impaired water on or before October 1, 2023; and 2028
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 7 of 14
(ii) for impervious surface located within all other watersheds of
the State, no later than October 1, 2033.
(B) Establish criteria and technical standards, such as best
management practices, for implementation of stormwater improvements for the
retrofitting of impervious surface subject to permitting under this subdivision
(3).
(C) Require that a discharge of stormwater from impervious surface
subject to the requirements of this section comply with the standards of
subsection (h) of this section for redevelopment of or renewal of a permit for
existing impervious surface.
(D) Allow the use of stormwater impact fees, offsets, and phosphorus
credit trading within the watershed of the water to which the stormwater
discharges or runs off.
* * *
Sec. 2. 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 85, Sec. I.12 is amended to read:
Sec. I.12. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Secs. I.1–I.12 shall take effect on July 1, 2017, except that Sec. I.10
(allocating clean water surcharge revenue to Vermont Housing and
Conservation Trust Fund) shall take effect on July 1, 2027 2036.
Sec. 3. 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 85, Sec. I.7(d) is amended to read:
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 8 of 14
(d) To compensate for this reduction of available property transfer tax
revenue, it is the intent of the General Assembly through this act to provide for
the transfer of $2,500,000.00 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust
Fund, as follows:
(1) Sec. D.100 of this act appropriates $11,304,840.00 in fiscal year
2018 from the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund to the Vermont
Housing and Conservation Board. Upon the effective date of this act,
$1,500,000.00 shall revert to the Fund, resulting in a fiscal year 2018 total
appropriation to the Board of $9,804,840.00. In fiscal year 2018 only, the
amount of $1,500,000.00 from the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust
Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund.
(2) As provided in Sec. I.9 of this act, from July 1, 2017 until
July 1, 2027 2036, pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9602a, the first $1,000,000.00 in
revenue generated by the clean water surcharge of 0.2 percent shall be
transferred to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund. In fiscal
year 2018 only, the Commissioner shall transfer the amount of $1,000,000.00
from the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund to the General Fund.
(3) After July 1, 2027 2036, pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9602a as amended
in Sec. I.10 of this act, $1,000,000.00 in total revenue generated by the clean
water surcharge of 0.04 percent shall be transferred to the Vermont Housing
and Conservation Trust Fund.
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 9 of 14
(4) As provided in Sec. I.11 of this act, the clean water surcharge will be
repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2039.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 1264c is added to read:
§ 1264c. LOCAL COMMUNITY IMPLEMENTATION SPECIAL FUND
(a) There is established the Local Community Implementation Special
Fund to be administered by the Secretary of Natural Resources in accordance
with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 to provide grants to municipalities to
assist in the stormwater permitting of residential subdivisions or orphan
systems in the State. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) an annual appropriation of at least $1,000,000.00 from the Clean
Water Fund;
(2) private gifts, bequests, and donations made to the State for any of the
purposes for which the Fund was established; and
(3) other funds from any public or private source intended for use for
any of the purposes for which the Fund has been established.
(b) The Secretary may issue grants from the funds to:
(1) a municipality subject to the permitting requirement under
subdivision 1264(c)(3) of this title for its municipal separate storm sewer
system when the municipality assumes under its municipal separate storm
sewer system permit the permitting requirements of an orphan system or other
residential stormwater system under subdivision 1264(d)(2) of this title; or
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 10 of 14
(2) a municipality that is not subject to the permitting requirement under
subdivision 1264(c)(3) of this title for its municipal separate storm sewer
system when the municipality assumes the full legal responsibility for a
stormwater system under subdivision 1264(d)(2) of this title or agrees to be a
co-applicant for a permit for an orphan system within the municipality.
(c) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall accept applications for grants
from the Fund until September 1 of each fiscal year. Grants shall be awarded
on a priority basis for stormwater systems with impending timing constraints
or for those projects that will achieve the greatest reduction in pollutant load.
(d) Annually, on or before January 31, the Department shall report to the
House Committee on Environment and the Senate Committee on Natural
Resources and Energy regarding operation and administration of the Local
Community Implementation Special Fund. The report shall include a
description of each grant awarded from the Fund in the previous calendar year.
(e) As used in this section, “orphan stormwater system” means a
stormwater system:
(1) that serves a residential subdivision;
(2) that operates under an expired stormwater discharge permit or was
never issued a stormwater discharge permit; and
(3) for which the original permittee, in the discretion of the Secretary of
Natural Resources, is no longer associated with the system.
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 11 of 14
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 1389(e) is amended to read:
(e) Priorities. In making recommendations under subsection (d) of this
section regarding the appropriate allocation of funds from the Clean Water
Fund, the Board shall prioritize as follows:
(1) As a first priority, make recommendations regarding funding for the
following grants and programs, which shall each be given equal priority:
(A) grants to clean water service providers to fund the reasonable
costs associated with the inspection, verification, operation, and maintenance
of clean water projects in a basin;
(B) grants to municipalities or property owners to assist with the
costs of complying with permitting requirements under subdivisions
1264(c)(1) and (7) of this title;
(C) the Water Quality Restoration Formula Grant under section 925
of this title;
(C)(D) the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets’ agricultural
water quality programs; and
(D)(E) the Water Quality Enhancement Grants under section 926 of
this title at a funding level of at least 20 percent of the annual balance of the
Clean Water Fund, provided that the maximum amount recommended under
this subdivision (D) (E) in any year shall not exceed $5,000,000.00; and
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 12 of 14
(E)(F) funding to partners for basin planning, basin water quality
council participation, education, and outreach as provided in subdivision
1253(d)(3) of this title, provided funding shall be at least $500,000.00.
(2) As the next priority after reviewing funding requests for programs
identified under subdivision (1) of this subsection:
(A) funding to programs or projects that address or repair riparian
conditions that increase the risk of flooding or pose a threat to life or property;
(B) funding for education and outreach regarding the implementation
of water quality requirements, including funding for education, outreach,
demonstration, and access to tools for the implementation of the Acceptable
Management Practices for Maintaining Water Quality on Logging Jobs in
Vermont, as adopted by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation;
(C) funding for the Municipal Stormwater Implementation Grant as
provided in section 928 of this title;
(D) funding for innovative or alternative technologies or practices
designed to improve water quality or reduce sources of pollution to surface
waters, including funding for innovative nutrient removal technologies and
community-based methane digesters that utilize manure, wastewater, and food
residuals to produce energy; and
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 13 of 14
(E) funding to purchase agricultural land in order to take that land out
of practice when the State water quality requirements cannot be remediated
through agricultural Best Management Practices.
(3) As the next priority after reviewing funding requests under
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, funding for the Developed Lands
Implementation Grant Program as provided in section 927 of this title.
Sec. 6. APPROPRIATION
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, $5,000,000.00 is transferred
from the Clean Water Fund to the Local Community Implementation Special
Fund in fiscal year 2025.
Sec. 7. 24 V.S.A. § 3616 is amended to read:
§ 3616. RENTS; RATES
(a) A municipal corporation, through its board may establish rates, rents, or
charges to be paid as the board may prescribe. The board may establish annual
charges separately for bond repayment, fixed operations and maintenance costs
and variable operations and maintenance costs dependent on flow.
(b) The rates, rents, or charges may be based upon:
(1) the metered consumption of water on premises connected with the
sewer system, however, the board may determine no user will be billed for
fixed operations and maintenance costs and bond payment less than the
average single-family charge;
VT LEG #379420 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.24
2025 Page 14 of 14
(2) the number of equivalent units connected with or served by the
sewage system based upon their estimated flows compared to the estimated
flows from a single-family dwelling, however, the board may determine no
user will be billed less than the minimum charge determined for the single-
family dwelling charge for fixed operations and maintenance costs and bond
payment;
* * *
(6) for groundwater, surface, or stormwater an equivalent residential
unit based on an average or median of the area of impervious surface on
residential property within the municipality; or
(7) any combination of these bases, provided the combination is
equitable.
* * *
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379420 v.1